Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0108

Relation to restraint of trade and antitrust laws.

To the extent a limited cooperative association or activities conducted by the association in this state meet the material requirements for other cooperatives entitled to an exemption from or immunity under any provision of RCW 19.86.030 through 19.86.050, the association and its activities are entitled to the exemption or immunity. This section does not create any new exemption or immunity for an association or affect any exemption or immunity provided to a cooperative organized under any law other than this chapter.

[ 2019 c 37 s 108.]